Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB2.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
New Section 1. The result of the election held on May 21, 2024,
on the question submitted by the board of education of unified school
district no. 200, Greeley county, for the purpose of authorizing the
issuance of general obligation bonds in an amount not to exceed
$4,600,000 to pay the costs to: (a) Construct, furnish, equip and acquire
improvements, additions and renovations to the school district's
elementary and junior/senior high school facility, including safety and
security improvements, playground improvements, locker room
additions and renovations, a gymnasium addition and improvements to
comply with the Americans with disabilities act; (b) construct, furnish,
equip and acquire other necessary renovations and improvements to
school district facilities; (c) make all other necessary improvements
appurtenant thereto; and (d) pay the costs of issuance and interest on
the bonds during construction of the project is hereby declared valid,
and the board of education may issue such general obligation bonds as
otherwise provided by law in an amount not to exceed $4,600,000 for
the purposes specified herein.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 10-120 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 10-120. (a) Whenever an election is required for the issuance
of bonds for any purpose by any municipality other than an irrigation
district or where a different procedure for giving notice of the election
is specifically provided by law, upon compliance with the legal
requirements necessary and precedent to the call for the election, the
proper municipal officers shall call an election. The election shall be
held within 60 days after compliance with the necessary requirements,
or within 90 days, should the longer period include the date of a general
election.
(b) Notice of the election shall be published in a newspaper of
general circulation in the municipality once each week for two
consecutive weeks and on the website of the county election office of
any county where the election is to be conducted if such county election
office has a website. The first publication shall be not less than 21 days
prior to the election. Notice of the election shall also be published on
the website of the county election office of any county where the
election is to be conducted. Such notice shall be published not less than
21 days prior to the election and If published on the website of the
county election office, such publication shall remain on the website
until the day after the election. The notice shall set forth the time and
place of holding the election and the purpose for which the bonds are to
be issued and shall be signed by the county election officer. The
election shall be held at the usual place of holding elections and shall
be conducted by the officers or persons provided by law for holding
elections in the municipality.
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 10-120 is hereby repealed.

SENATE BILL No. 2—page 2
Sec. 4. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the Kansas register.
I hereby certify that the above BILL originated in the
SENATE, and passed that body
_________________________
_________________________
President of the Senate.
_________________________
Secretary of the Senate.
________________________
Passed the HOUSE
_________________________
Speaker of the House.
_________________________
Chief Clerk of the House.
____________________________
APPROVED
_________________________
Governor.